District of Columbia statutes.
50-1606

Contributory negligence.

Failure to wear a helmet as described in this subchapter shall not be considered as evidence of either negligence per se, contributory negligence, or assumption of the risk in any civil suit arising out of any accident in which a person under 16 years of age is injured. Failure to wear a helmet shall not be a admissible as evidence in the trial of any civil action, nor in any way diminish or reduce the damages recoverable in such action.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-179, § 7, 32 DCR 764
as added May 23, 2000, D.C. Law 13-112, § 2(b), 47 DCR 1985

History